Utah statutes.
62A-4a-406.   Photographs.

(1)  Any physician, surgeon, medical examiner, peace officer, law enforcement official, or public health officer or official may take photographs of the areas of trauma visible on a child and, if medically indicated, perform radiological examinations.

(2)  Photographs may be taken of the premises or of objects relevant to a reported circumstance of abuse or neglect.

(3)  Photographs or X-rays, and all other medical records pertinent to an investigation for abuse or neglect shall be made available to the division, law enforcement officials, and the court.

